California, session 20252026, SB448.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 602.15 is added to the Penal Code, to read:602.15. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the following procedure may be used for the removal of a squatter from a property:(1) The If the property owner previously filed a notarized request form provided by a law enforcement agency pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 602, the property owner may serve a demand to vacate on a squatter on the property.(A) The demand to vacate shall include the following heading, printed in at least 16-point type: “Demand to Immediately Vacate the Property.”(B) The demand to vacate shall be addressed to all unauthorized persons in possession and shall include the full mailing address and assessor’s parcel number of the property, including, if applicable, a unit or apartment number, printed in at least a 16-point type.(C) The demand to vacate shall include the name, title, telephone number, and email address of the property owner, printed in at least a 16-point type.(D) The demand to vacate shall include the following statement printed in at least 12-point type: “You are trespassing on the property described in this notice. You are not an authorized occupant of the property. You must vacate the property and remove all personal possessions within 72 hours after service of this notice. Failure to comply with this demand will result in forcible removal from this property by local law enforcement.”(E) Service may be effectuated by either personal delivery to any occupant of the property who is at least 18 years of age, or by the conspicuous posting of the demand at the property and thereafter mailing a copy of the demand by first-class mail, to the address where the demand was posted.(2) No sooner than 72 hours after the service of the demand to vacate, the property owner may file a request for removal with local law enforcement agency having primary jurisdiction where the property is located.(A) The request for removal shall include all of the following:(i) A written request for the removal of unauthorized persons from the property.(ii) The street address and assessor’s parcel number of the property.(iii) The name, address, and telephone number of the person making the request and proof of ownership of the property, which may be established by a copy of the recorded deed, or proof of agency, which may be established by a written authorization from, or executed contract with, the legal owner of the property.(iv) A copy of the demand described in paragraph (1), including proof of service of the demand.(v) A statement, signed under penalty of perjury, that the person submitting the request is the owner of the property or authorized agent thereof, that the persons residing on present at the subject property are unauthorized persons, that all information provided in the request is accurate and true to the best of their knowledge, and that the request is being made in good faith and in compliance with all of the provisions of this section.(vi) The request for removal may, but is not required to, include additional evidence of the unauthorized occupancy, including, but not limited to, restrictions of access such as boarded-up doors and windows, posted signs regarding construction or prohibition of trespassing, video or security camera footage of the unauthorized person or persons entering or accessing the property through windows or locked or broken doors.(B) A local law enforcement agency may prescribe the form and manner of submission for the request described in this paragraph.(C) A local law enforcement agency may charge a reasonable fee to cover the costs of processing a request for removal and conducting a removal, including any standby time.(3) Upon receipt of a request described in paragraph (2), local law enforcement shall verify the request and, if valid, shall remove the unauthorized persons from the property without unreasonable delay.(A) The local law enforcement agency shall provide the requester with reasonable notice of the date and time of the scheduled removal and may require the requester to be present.(B) The responsibility of the local law enforcement agency at the time of removal shall be to make entry into the property and to remove unauthorized persons from the property. Upon the request of the owner, the law enforcement agency shall stand by for a reasonable time while any personal property is removed from the property and the locks are changed.(b)The local law enforcement agency performing a removal pursuant to this section in good faith shall be immune from liability to the property owner, to persons removed from the property, or to any third party due to the loss, damage, or destruction of property or for wrongful eviction or arrest.(c)(b) (1) A person who fraudulently causes or attempts to cause the removal of another person from property pursuant to this section is guilty of a felony punishable a crime punishable by imprisonment in a county jail for up to one year or pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.(2)An unauthorized person who fraudulently contests or interferes with their lawful removal pursuant to this section by knowingly presenting false information or documentation to law enforcement officials purporting to give that person a lawful right to tenancy or possession of the property is guilty of a felony punishable pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.(3)(2) An occupant who has been removed from a property pursuant to this section under circumstances in which the owner acted fraudulently or in bad faith may file a civil action for restoration of possession, damages equal to three months of rent, expenses incurred as a result of the removal, and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in that action.(4)(3) This section does not limit the authority of local law enforcement to make an arrest or take other legal action for a related violation of law, including, without limitation, trespassing, burglary, theft, vandalism, possession of controlled substances or weapons, or resisting or obstructing a peace officer.(d)(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law or local ordinance, this section is intended to provide the remedies for the unauthorized occupation of residential property by squatters.(2) This section shall apply only to unauthorized persons. This section does not apply to a tenant, former tenant who is in an active dispute with the owner, holdover tenant, or a person with a bona fide claim of tenancy or title, including title by adverse possession.(e)(d) As used in this section, the following terms are defined as follows:(1) “Demand” means a demand to vacate a property described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).(2) “Owner” means the legal owner of the property or an agent thereof, including a property manager.(3) “Property” means a dwelling structure or a dwelling unit within a structure, including, without limitation, a house, mobilehome, condominium, or apartment. apartment, or dwelling structure or dwelling unit located on federally recognized tribal lands.(4) “Squatter” or “unauthorized person” means a person who has unlawfully entered and is occupying a property without the consent of the owner and refuses to leave upon request or fraudulently claims a lawful right of possession.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act or because costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.However, if the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains other costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.